Hawaii statutes.
§172-8 Notice to owners to have boundaries
determined. Upon the completion of a list, the comptroller shall give
public notice thereof throughout the State at least once each week for four
successive weeks, together with name or names of the last known owner or
owners, and with a notice that unless the unsurveyed lands have had their
boundaries properly and legally determined prior to July 1, 1925, the State
shall proceed in the manner hereinafter provided for. [L 1919, c 208, §2; am L
1923, c 155, §2; RL 1925, §565; RL 1935, §1691; RL 1945, §4638; RL 1955,
§100-8; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §12; HRS §172-8; am L 1998, c 2, §40]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next